Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2607
Commission; executive board; purpose; members; powers.

(1) For purposes of administration of the commission during the interim between regular quarterly meetings, there is hereby established an executive board of the Commission on African American Affairs consisting of the chairperson of the commission and four members of the commission.

(2) The executive board may enter into contracts for consultation services, supplies, and equipment, if the amount contracted for does not exceed two thousand dollars in any one contract, and may supervise all initiatives relating to the affairs of African American people instituted and authorized by the commission.

Laws 2020, LB918, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB69, § 6.